Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.660

Insurance or protection—Premiums—Health benefits for graduate student appointees—Students participating in studies or research outside the United States.

(1) The governing boards of any of the state's institutions of higher education may make available liability, life, health, health care, accident, disability and salary protection or insurance or any one of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of insurance, or any other type of insurance or protection, for the regents or trustees and students of the institution. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the premiums due on such protection or insurance shall be borne by the assenting regents, trustees, or students. The regents or trustees of any of the state institutions of higher education may make liability insurance available for employees of the institutions. The premiums due on such liability insurance shall be borne by the university or college.

(2) A governing board of a public four-year institution of higher education may make available, and pay the costs of, health benefits for graduate students holding graduate service appointments, designated as such by the institution. Such health benefits may provide coverage for spouses and dependents of such graduate student appointees.

(3) A governing board of a state institution of higher education may require its students who participate in studies or research outside of the United States sponsored, arranged, or approved by the institution to purchase, as a condition of participation, insurance approved by the governing board, that will provide coverage for expenses arising from emergency evacuation, repatriation of remains, injury, illness, or death sustained while participating in the study or research abroad. The governing board of the institution may bear all or part of the costs of the insurance. A student shall not be required to purchase insurance if the student is covered under an insurance policy that will provide coverage for expenses arising from emergency evacuation, repatriation of remains, injury, illness, or death sustained while participating in the study or research abroad.

[ 2009 c 297 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 9 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 88 s 1. Prior: 1973 1st ex.s. c 147 s 4; 1973 1st ex.s. c 9 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 269 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 237 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.660; prior: 1967 c 135 s 2, part; 1959 c 187 s 1, part. Formerly RCW 28.76.410, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Effect of veto—Savings—Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 147: See notes following RCW 41.05.050.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 269: See note following RCW 28A.400.350.